Hawaii statutes.
§432:2-604 Examination of societies; no
adverse publications. (a) The commissioner, or any person the
commissioner may appoint, may examine any domestic, foreign or alien society
transacting or applying for admission to transact business in this State in the
same manner as authorized for examination of domestic, foreign or alien
insurers. Requirements of notice and an opportunity to respond before findings
are made public as provided in the laws regulating insurers shall also be
applicable to the examination of societies.

(b) The expense of each examination and of
each valuation, including compensation and actual expense of examiners, shall
be paid by the society examined or whose certificates are valued, upon
statements furnished by the commissioner. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next